Illinois, session 104th, SB1409.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Wildlife Code is amended by changing 5Sections 2.20 and 2.33 as follows: 6    (520 ILCS 5/2.20)  (from Ch. 61, par. 2.20)7    Sec. 2.20. It shall be unlawful to take waterfowl or any 8species of wildlife in any area managed by the Department 9unless those species are taken in compliance with the rules 10and regulations established by the Department of which notice 11is given in accordance with Section 1.13.12    Within one year of the effective date of this amendatory 13Act of the 104th General Assembly, to the extent permitted by 14federal law, the Department shall adopt or amend rules 15effectuating an increased shooting time for waterfowl of 30 16minutes after sunset on at least one day per week during 17seasons for the hunting of waterfowl. 18(Source: P.A. 81-382.) 19    (520 ILCS 5/2.33)20    Sec. 2.33. Prohibitions. 21    (a) It is unlawful to carry or possess any gun in any State 22refuge unless otherwise permitted by administrative rule.  SB1409- 2 -LRB104 07393 BDA 17434 b1    (b) It is unlawful to use or possess any snare or 2snare-like device, deadfall, net, or pit trap to take any 3species, except that snares not powered by springs or other 4mechanical devices may be used to trap fur-bearing mammals, in 5water sets only, if at least one-half of the snare noose is 6located underwater at all times.7    (c) It is unlawful for any person at any time to take a 8wild mammal protected by this Act from its den by means of any 9mechanical device, spade, or digging device or to use smoke or 10other gases to dislodge or remove such mammal except as 11provided in Section 2.37.12    (d) It is unlawful to use a ferret or any other small 13mammal which is used in the same or similar manner for which 14ferrets are used for the purpose of frightening or driving any 15mammals from their dens or hiding places.16    (e) (Blank).17    (f) It is unlawful to use spears, gigs, hooks, or any like 18device to take any species protected by this Act.19    (g) It is unlawful to use poisons, chemicals, or 20explosives for the purpose of taking any species protected by 21this Act.22    (h) It is unlawful to hunt adjacent to or near any peat, 23grass, brush, or other inflammable substance when it is 24burning.25    (i) It is unlawful to take, pursue or intentionally harass 26or disturb in any manner any wild birds or mammals by use or   SB1409- 3 -LRB104 07393 BDA 17434 b1aid of any vehicle, conveyance, or unmanned aircraft as 2defined by the Illinois Aeronautics Act, except as permitted 3by the Code of Federal Regulations for the taking of 4waterfowl; except that nothing in this subsection shall 5prohibit the use of unmanned aircraft in the inspection of a 6public utility facility, tower, or structure or a mobile 7service facility, tower, or structure by a public utility, as 8defined in Section 3-105 of the Public Utilities Act, or a 9provider of mobile services as defined in Section 153 of Title 1047 of the United States Code. It is also unlawful to use the 11lights of any vehicle or conveyance, any light connected to 12any vehicle or conveyance, or any other lighting device or 13mechanism from inside or on a vehicle or conveyance in any area 14where wildlife may be found except in accordance with Section 152.37 of this Act; however, nothing in this Section shall 16prohibit the normal use of headlamps for the purpose of 17driving upon a roadway. For purposes of this Section, any 18other lighting device or mechanism shall include, but not be 19limited to, any device that uses infrared or other light not 20visible to the naked eye, electronic image intensification, 21active illumination, thermal imaging, or night vision. Striped 22skunk, opossum, red fox, gray fox, raccoon, bobcat, and coyote 23may be taken during the open season by use of a small light 24which is worn on the body or hand-held by a person on foot and 25not in any vehicle.26    (j) It is unlawful to use any shotgun larger than 10 gauge   SB1409- 4 -LRB104 07393 BDA 17434 b1while taking or attempting to take any of the species 2protected by this Act.3    (k) It is unlawful to use or possess in the field any 4shotgun shell loaded with a shot size larger than lead BB or 5steel T (.20 diameter) when taking or attempting to take any 6species of wild game mammals (excluding white-tailed deer), 7wild game birds, migratory waterfowl or migratory game birds 8protected by this Act, except white-tailed deer as provided 9for in Section 2.26 and other species as provided for by 10subsection (l) or administrative rule.11    (l) It is unlawful to take any species of wild game, except 12white-tailed deer and fur-bearing mammals, with a shotgun 13loaded with slugs unless otherwise provided for by 14administrative rule.15    (m) It is unlawful to use any shotgun capable of holding 16more than 3 shells in the magazine or chamber combined, except 17on game breeding and hunting preserve areas licensed under 18Section 3.27 and except as permitted by the Code of Federal 19Regulations for the taking of waterfowl. If the shotgun is 20capable of holding more than 3 shells, it shall, while being 21used on an area other than a game breeding and shooting 22preserve area licensed pursuant to Section 3.27, be fitted 23with a one-piece plug that is irremovable without dismantling 24the shotgun or otherwise altered to render it incapable of 25holding more than 3 shells in the magazine and chamber, 26combined.  SB1409- 5 -LRB104 07393 BDA 17434 b1    (n) It is unlawful for any person, except persons who 2possess a permit to hunt from a vehicle as provided in this 3Section and persons otherwise permitted by law, to have or 4carry any gun in or on any vehicle, conveyance, or aircraft, 5unless such gun is unloaded and enclosed in a case, except that 6at field trials authorized by Section 2.34 of this Act, 7unloaded guns or guns loaded with blank cartridges only may be 8carried on horseback while not contained in a case, or to have 9or carry any bow or arrow device in or on any vehicle unless 10such bow or arrow device is unstrung or enclosed in a case, or 11otherwise made inoperable unless in accordance with the 12Firearm Concealed Carry Act.13    (o) (Blank).14    (p) It is unlawful to take game birds, migratory game 15birds or migratory waterfowl with a rifle, pistol, revolver, 16or air rifle.17    (q) It is unlawful to fire a rifle, pistol, revolver, or 18air rifle on, over, or into any waters of this State, including 19frozen waters.20    (r) It is unlawful to discharge any gun or bow and arrow 21device along, upon, across, or from any public right-of-way or 22highway in this State.23    (s) It is unlawful to use a silencer or other device to 24muffle or mute the sound of the explosion or report resulting 25from the firing of any gun.26    (t) It is unlawful for any person to take or attempt to   SB1409- 6 -LRB104 07393 BDA 17434 b1take any species of wildlife or parts thereof, or allow a dog 2to hunt, within or upon the land of another, or upon waters 3flowing over or standing on the land of another, or to 4knowingly shoot a gun or bow and arrow device at any wildlife 5physically on or flying over the property of another without 6first obtaining permission from the owner or the owner's 7designee. For the purposes of this Section, the owner's 8designee means anyone who the owner designates in a written 9authorization and the authorization must contain (i) the legal 10or common description of property for which such authority is 11given, (ii) the extent that the owner's designee is authorized 12to make decisions regarding who is allowed to take or attempt 13to take any species of wildlife or parts thereof, and (iii) the 14owner's notarized signature. Before enforcing this Section, 15the law enforcement officer must have received notice from the 16owner or the owner's designee of a violation of this Section. 17Statements made to the law enforcement officer regarding this 18notice shall not be rendered inadmissible by the hearsay rule 19when offered for the purpose of showing the required notice.20    (u) It is unlawful for any person to discharge any firearm 21for the purpose of taking any of the species protected by this 22Act, or hunt with gun or dog, or allow a dog to hunt, within 23300 yards of an inhabited dwelling without first obtaining 24permission from the owner or tenant, except that while 25trapping, hunting with bow and arrow, hunting with dog and 26shotgun using shot shells only, or hunting with shotgun using   SB1409- 7 -LRB104 07393 BDA 17434 b1shot shells only, or providing outfitting services under a 2waterfowl outfitter permit, or on licensed game breeding and 3hunting preserve areas, as defined in Section 3.27, on 4federally owned and managed lands and on Department owned, 5managed, leased, or controlled lands, a 100 yard restriction 6shall apply.7    (v) It is unlawful for any person to remove fur-bearing 8mammals from, or to move or disturb in any manner, the traps 9owned by another person without written authorization of the 10owner to do so.11    (w) It is unlawful for any owner of a dog to allow his or 12her dog to pursue, harass, or kill deer, except that nothing in 13this Section shall prohibit the tracking of wounded deer with 14a dog in accordance with the provisions of Section 2.26 of this 15Code.16    (x) It is unlawful for any person to wantonly or 17carelessly injure or destroy, in any manner whatsoever, any 18real or personal property on the land of another while engaged 19in hunting or trapping thereon.20    (y) It is unlawful to hunt wild game protected by this Act 21between one-half hour after sunset and one-half hour before 22sunrise, except that hunting hours between one-half hour after 23sunset and one-half hour before sunrise may be established by 24administrative rule for waterfowl, to the extent permitted by 25federal law, and for fur-bearing mammals.26    (z) It is unlawful to take any game bird (excluding wild   SB1409- 8 -LRB104 07393 BDA 17434 b1turkeys and crippled pheasants not capable of normal flight 2and otherwise irretrievable) protected by this Act when not 3flying. Nothing in this Section shall prohibit a person from 4carrying an uncased, unloaded shotgun in a boat, while in 5pursuit of a crippled migratory waterfowl that is incapable of 6normal flight, for the purpose of attempting to reduce the 7migratory waterfowl to possession, provided that the attempt 8is made immediately upon downing the migratory waterfowl and 9is done within 400 yards of the blind from which the migratory 10waterfowl was downed. This exception shall apply only to 11migratory game birds that are not capable of normal flight. 12Migratory waterfowl that are crippled may be taken only with a 13shotgun as regulated by subsection (j) of this Section using 14shotgun shells as regulated in subsection (k) of this Section.15    (aa) It is unlawful to use or possess any device that may 16be used for tree climbing or cutting while hunting fur-bearing 17mammals, excluding coyotes. However, coyotes may not be hunted 18utilizing these devices during open season for deer except by 19properly licensed deer hunters.20    (bb) It is unlawful for any person, except licensed game 21breeders, pursuant to Section 2.29 to import, carry into, or 22possess alive in this State any species of wildlife taken 23outside of this State, without obtaining permission to do so 24from the Director.25    (cc) It is unlawful for any person to have in his or her 26possession any freshly killed species protected by this Act   SB1409- 9 -LRB104 07393 BDA 17434 b1during the season closed for taking.2    (dd) It is unlawful to take any species protected by this 3Act and retain it alive except as provided by administrative 4rule.5    (ee) It is unlawful to possess any rifle while in the field 6during gun deer season except as provided in Sections 2.25 and 72.26 and administrative rules.8    (ff) It is unlawful for any person to take any species 9protected by this Act, except migratory waterfowl, during the 10gun deer hunting season in those counties open to gun deer 11hunting, unless he or she wears, when in the field, a cap and 12upper outer garment of a solid blaze orange color or solid 13blaze pink color, with such articles of clothing displaying a 14minimum of 400 square inches of blaze orange or solid blaze 15pink color material.16    (gg) It is unlawful during the upland game season for any 17person to take upland game with a firearm unless he or she 18wears, while in the field, a cap of solid blaze orange color or 19solid blaze pink color. For purposes of this Act, upland game 20is defined as Bobwhite Quail, Hungarian Partridge, Ring-necked 21Pheasant, Eastern Cottontail, and Swamp Rabbit.22    (hh) It shall be unlawful to kill or cripple any species 23protected by this Act for which there is a bag limit without 24making a reasonable effort to retrieve such species and 25include such in the bag limit. It shall be unlawful for any 26person having control over harvested game mammals, game birds,   SB1409- 10 -LRB104 07393 BDA 17434 b1or migratory game birds for which there is a bag limit to 2wantonly waste or destroy the usable meat of the game, except 3this shall not apply to wildlife taken under Sections 2.37 or 43.22 of this Code. For purposes of this subsection, "usable 5meat" means the breast meat of a game bird or migratory game 6bird and the hind ham and front shoulders of a game mammal. It 7shall be unlawful for any person to place, leave, dump, or 8abandon a wildlife carcass or parts of it along or upon a 9public right-of-way or highway or on public or private 10property, including a waterway or stream, without the 11permission of the owner or tenant. It shall not be unlawful to 12discard game meat that is determined to be unfit for human 13consumption.14    (ii) This Section shall apply only to those species 15protected by this Act taken within the State. Any species or 16any parts thereof, legally taken in and transported from other 17states or countries, may be possessed within the State, except 18as provided in this Section and Sections 2.35, 2.36, and 3.21.19    (jj) (Blank).20    (kk) Nothing contained in this Section shall prohibit the 21Director from issuing permits to paraplegics or to other 22persons with disabilities who meet the requirements set forth 23in administrative rule to shoot or hunt from a vehicle as 24provided by that rule, provided that such is otherwise in 25accord with this Act.26    (ll) Nothing contained in this Act shall prohibit the   SB1409- 11 -LRB104 07393 BDA 17434 b1taking of aquatic life protected by the Fish and Aquatic Life 2Code or birds and mammals protected by this Act, except deer 3and fur-bearing mammals, from a boat not camouflaged or 4disguised to alter its identity or to further provide a place 5of concealment and not propelled by sail or mechanical power. 6However, only shotguns not larger than 10 gauge nor smaller 7than .410 bore loaded with not more than 3 shells of a shot 8size no larger than lead BB or steel T (.20 diameter) may be 9used to take species protected by this Act.10    (mm) Nothing contained in this Act shall prohibit the use 11of a shotgun, not larger than 10 gauge nor smaller than a 20 12gauge, with a rifled barrel.13    (nn) It shall be unlawful to possess any species of 14wildlife or wildlife parts taken unlawfully in Illinois, any 15other state, or any other country, whether or not the wildlife 16or wildlife parts are indigenous to Illinois. For the purposes 17of this subsection, the statute of limitations for unlawful 18possession of wildlife or wildlife parts shall not cease until 192 years after the possession has permanently ended. 20    (oo) It is unlawful while deer hunting:21        (1) to possess or be in close proximity to a rifle that 22    is not centerfire; or23        (2) to be in possession of or in close proximity to a 24    magazine that is capable of making a rifle not a single 25    shot. 26(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-837, eff. 5-13-22;   SB1409- 12 -LRB104 07393 BDA 17434 b1102-932, eff. 1-1-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.)